Utah statutes.
53A-3-405.   Approval of purchases or indebtedness -- Board approval of identified purchases.

(1)  An officer or employee of a school district may not make a purchase or incur indebtedness on behalf of the district without the approval and order of the board.

(2)  The board shall adopt one of the following approval methods, or a combination of the two:

(a)  The board shall approve an appropriation for identified purchases in the district budget.  Each purchase made under an identified purchase does not require additional board approval.

(b)  The board shall approve individual purchases when made throughout the fiscal year.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

